Nevada, session 83, AB399.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, an
insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall
include in the policy coverage for medically necessary treatment
and care for diseases and conditions caused by severe obesity,
including, without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an insured who is
18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, an insurer may require:
(a) An insured to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. An insurer may limit coverage for bariatric surgery and
related preoperative and postoperative services to not more than
one such surgery per lifetime.
4. An insurer may require the physician seeking coverage for
bariatric surgery pursuant to subsection 1 to provide a written
statement to the insurer that the treatment prescribed is medically
necessary and will be provided in accordance with the American
Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor
organization, or the American College of Surgeons, or its
successor organization.
5. This section does not require a policy of health insurance
to include coverage for any drug that is injected to lower glucose
levels or any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on
or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
-
*AB399*

– 3 –
coverage required by this section and any provision of the policy
which is in conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of an
insured or to preserve the existing state of health of the insured;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the insured.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 2. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, an
insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health insurance
shall include in the policy coverage for medically necessary
treatment and care for diseases and conditions caused by severe
obesity, including, without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an insured who is
18 years of age or older; and
-
*AB399*

– 4 –
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, an insurer may require:
(a) An insured to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. An insurer may limit coverage for bariatric surgery and
related preoperative and postoperative services to not more than
one such surgery per lifetime.
4. An insurer may require the physician seeking coverage for
bariatric surgery pursuant to subsection 1 to provide a written
statement to the insurer that the treatment is medically necessary
and will be provided in accordance with the American Society for
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor organization, or
the American College of Surgeons, or its successor organization.
5. This section does not require a policy of group health
insurance to include coverage for any drug that is injected to
lower glucose levels or any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by this section and any provision
of the policy which is in conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
-
*AB399*

– 5 –
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of an
insured or to preserve the existing state of health of the insured;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the insured.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 4. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, a
carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall include in
the plan coverage for medically necessary treatment and care for
diseases and conditions caused by severe obesity, including,
without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an insured who is
18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, a carrier may require:
(a) An insured to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. A carrier may limit coverage for bariatric surgery and
related preoperative and postoperative services to not more than
one such surgery per lifetime.
4. A carrier may require the physician seeking coverage for
bariatric surgery pursuant to subsection 1 to provide a written
statement to the carrier that the treatment prescribed is medically
necessary and will be provided in accordance with the American
Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor
organization, or the American College of Surgeons, or its
successor organization.
-
*AB399*

– 6 –
5. This section does not require a health benefit plan to
include coverage for any drug that is injected to lower glucose
levels or any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section and any provision of the plan
which is in conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of an
insured or to preserve the existing state of health of the insured;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the insured.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 5. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 4 of this act to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 6. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, a
society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall include in the
contract coverage for medically necessary treatment and care for
-
*AB399*

– 7 –
diseases and conditions caused by severe obesity, including,
without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an insured who is
18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, a society may require:
(a) An insured to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. A society may limit coverage for bariatric surgery and
related preoperative and postoperative services to not more than
one such surgery per lifetime.
4. A society may require the physician seeking coverage for
bariatric surgery pursuant to subsection 1 to provide a written
statement to the society that the treatment is medically necessary
and will be provided in accordance with the American Society for
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor organization, or
the American College of Surgeons, or its successor organization.
5. This section does not require a benefit contract to include
coverage for any drug that is injected to lower glucose levels or
any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section and any provision of the contract which is
in conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
-
*AB399*

– 8 –
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of an
insured or to preserve the existing state of health of the insured;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the insured.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 7. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, a
hospital or medical services corporation that offers or issues a
policy of health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for
medically necessary treatment and care for diseases and
conditions caused by severe obesity, including, without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an insured who is
18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, a hospital or medical services
corporation may require:
(a) An insured to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation may limit
coverage for bariatric surgery and related preoperative and
postoperative services to not more than one such surgery per
lifetime.
4. A hospital or medical services corporation may require the
physician seeking coverage for bariatric surgery pursuant to
subsection 1 to provide a written statement to the hospital or
medical services corporation that the treatment is medically
-
*AB399*

– 9 –
necessary and will be provided in accordance with the American
Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor
organization, or the American College of Surgeons, or its
successor organization.
5. This section does not require a policy of health insurance
to include coverage for any drug that is injected to lower glucose
levels or any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on
or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section and any provision of the policy
which is in conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of an
insured or to preserve the existing state of health of the insured;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the insured.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 8. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, a
health maintenance organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall include in the plan coverage for medically
necessary treatment and care for diseases and conditions caused
by severe obesity, including, without limitation:
-
*AB399*

– 10 –
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an enrollee who
is 18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, a health maintenance organization may
require:
(a) An enrollee to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. A health maintenance organization may limit coverage for
bariatric surgery and related preoperative and postoperative
services to not more than one such surgery per lifetime.
4. A health maintenance organization may require the
physician seeking coverage for bariatric surgery pursuant to
subsection 1 to provide a written statement to the health
maintenance organization that the treatment is medically
necessary and will be provided in accordance with the American
Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor
organization, or the American College of Surgeons, or its
successor organization.
5. This section does not require a health care plan to include
coverage for any drug that is injected to lower glucose levels or
any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section and any provision of the plan which is in
conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
-
*AB399*

– 11 –
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of an
enrollee or to preserve the existing state of health of the enrollee;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the enrollee.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 9. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 do not apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
-
*AB399*

– 12 –
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, and section 8 of this act, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 apply
to a health maintenance organization that provides health care
services through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 10. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 8 of this act, 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
-
*AB399*

– 13 –
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of
NRS 695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
-
*AB399*

– 14 –
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 11. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations authorized by this section, a
managed care organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall include in the plan coverage for medically necessary
treatment and care for diseases and conditions caused by severe
obesity, including, without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for an insured who is
18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As conditions of providing coverage for a bariatric surgery
pursuant to subsection 1, a managed care organization may
require:
(a) An insured to successfully complete a preoperative period
of not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. A managed care organization may limit coverage for
bariatric surgery and related preoperative and postoperative
services to not more than one such surgery per lifetime.
4. A managed care organization shall require the physician
seeking coverage for bariatric surgery pursuant to subsection 1 to
provide a written statement to the managed care organization that
the treatment is medically necessary and will be provided in
accordance with the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric
Surgery, or its successor organization, or the American College of
Surgeons, or its successor organization.
5. This section does not require a health care plan to include
coverage for any drug that is injected to lower glucose levels or
any other drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section and any provision of the plan which is in
conflict with this section is void.
7. As used in this section:
-
*AB399*

– 15 –
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 12. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 15 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
-
*AB399*

– 16 –
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 13. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
-
*AB399*

– 17 –
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive, and
section 3 of this act, 689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675,
689B.265, 689B.287 and 689B.500 apply to coverage provided
pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of NRS
689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage for
active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
-
*AB399*

– 18 –
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 14. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, and section 11 of this act, 695G.176,
695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to
695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and 695G.415, in the same manner
as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required
to comply with those provisions.
-
*AB399*

– 19 –
Sec. 15. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that federal financial participation is
available and subject to the limitations authorized by this section,
the director shall include under Medicaid coverage for medically
necessary treatment and care for diseases and conditions caused
by severe obesity, including, without limitation:
(a) Medically necessary bariatric surgery for a person who is
18 years of age or older; and
(b) Related preoperative and postoperative services, including,
without limitation, psychological screening, counseling, behavior
modification, physical therapy and nutritional education.
2. As a condition of providing coverage for a bariatric
surgery, the Director may require:
(a) A person to successfully complete a preoperative period of
not more than 3 months that includes services recommended by
the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its
successor organization; and
(b) That the bariatric surgery be performed in a medical
facility that holds Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Accreditation
issued by the American College of Surgeons, or its successor
organization.
3. The Director may limit coverage for bariatric surgery and
related preoperative and postoperative services to not more than
one such surgery per lifetime.
4. The Director may require the physician seeking coverage
for bariatric surgery pursuant to subsection 1 to provide a written
statement to the Director that the treatment is medically necessary
and will be provided in accordance with the American Society for
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery, or its successor organization, or
the American College of Surgeons, or its successor organization.
5. This section does not require Medicaid to include coverage
for any drug that is injected to lower glucose levels or any other
drug prescribed for weight loss.
6. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive
federal funding to provide the coverage described in subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirement of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
7. As used in this section:
-
*AB399*

– 20 –
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Severe obesity” means:
(1) A body mass index of 40 or higher; or
(2) A body mass index of 35 or higher with an associated
comorbidity, which may include, without limitation, hypertension,
cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea or diabetes.
Sec. 16. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 17. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 16, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB399*